Oklahoma, session 2026, SB671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 71, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 71. A. Except as provided in subsection C of this


section or where exempted by federal law, every agency or a


political subdivision of this state shall verify the lawful presence


in the United States of any natural person fourteen (14) years of


age or older who has applied for any state or local public benefits


benefit, as defined in 8 U.S.C., Section 1621 this section, or for


federal public benefits, as defined in 8 U.S.C., Section 1611, that


is administered by an agency or a political subdivision of this


state.



Req. No. 324 Page 1


B. The provisions of this section shall be enforced without


regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity, or national origin.


C. Verification of lawful presence under the provisions of this


section shall not be required:


1. For any purpose for which lawful presence in the United


States is not restricted by law, ordinance, or regulation;


2. For assistance for health care items and services that are


necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition, as


defined in 42 U.S.C., Section 1396b(v)(3), of the alien involved and


are not related to an organ transplant procedure;


3. For short-term, noncash, in-kind emergency disaster relief;


4. For public health assistance for immunizations with respect


to diseases and for testing and treatment of symptoms of


communicable diseases whether or not such symptoms are caused by a


communicable disease;


5. For application of special volunteer health care licenses


that specify the eligible volunteer shall be either retired from


practice in this state or actively licensed with a clean record in


another state and that such eligible volunteer shall not receive or


have the expectation to receive any payment or compensation, either


direct or indirect, for any services rendered in this state under


the special volunteer license; or


6. For programs, services, or assistance such as soup kitchens,


crisis counseling and intervention, and short-term shelter specified

Req. No. 324 Page 2


by the United States Attorney General, in the sole and unreviewable


discretion of the United States Attorney General after consultation


with appropriate federal agencies and departments which:


a. deliver in-kind services at the community level,


including through public or private nonprofit


agencies,


b. do not condition the provision of assistance, the


amount of assistance provided, or the cost of


assistance provided on the income or resources of the


individual recipient, and


c. are necessary for the protection of life or safety.


D. Verification of lawful presence in the United States by the


agency or political subdivision required to make such verification


shall require that the applicant execute an affidavit under penalty


of perjury that:


1. He or she is a United States citizen; or


2. He or she is a qualified alien under the federal Immigration


and Nationality Act and is lawfully present in the United States.


The agency or political subdivision providing the state or local


public benefits benefit shall provide notary public services at no


cost to the applicant.


E. For any applicant who has executed the affidavit described


in paragraph 2 of subsection D of this section, eligibility for


benefits shall be verified through the Systematic Alien Verification

Req. No. 324 Page 3


for Entitlements (SAVE) Program operated by the United States


Department of Homeland Security or an equivalent program designated


by the United States Department of Homeland Security. Until such


eligibility verification is made, the affidavit may be presumed to


be proof of lawful presence for the purposes of this section.


F. Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a false,


fictitious, or fraudulent statement of representation in an


affidavit executed pursuant to subsection D of this section shall be


subject to criminal penalties applicable in this state for


fraudulently obtaining public assistance program benefits. If the


affidavit constitutes a false claim of U.S. citizenship under 18


U.S.C., Section 911, a complaint shall be filed by the agency


requiring the affidavit with the United States Attorney General for


the applicable district based upon the venue in which the affidavit


was executed.


G. Agencies or political subdivisions of this state may adopt


variations to the requirements of the provisions of this section


which demonstrably improve the efficiency or reduce delay in the


verification process, or to provide for adjudication of unique


individual circumstances where the verification procedures in this


section would impose unusual hardship on a legal resident of


Oklahoma.


H. It shall be unlawful for any agency or a political


subdivision of this state to provide any state, local, or federal

Req. No. 324 Page 4


benefit, as defined in 8 U.S.C., Section 1621, or 8 U.S.C., Section


1611, in violation of the provisions of this section.


I. Each state agency or department which administers any


program of state or local public benefits shall provide an annual


report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and


the Speaker of the House of Representatives with respect to its


compliance with the provisions of this section. Each agency or


department shall monitor the Systematic Alien Verification for


Entitlements Program for application verification errors and


significant delays and shall provide an annual public report on such


errors and significant delays and recommendations to ensure that the


application of the Systematic Alien Verification of Entitlements


Program is not erroneously denying benefits to legal residents of


Oklahoma. Errors shall also be reported to the United States


Department of Homeland Security by each agency or department.


J. As used in this section, “state or local public benefit” has


the same meaning as provided by 8 U.S.C., Section 1621(c)(1)(B), but


does not include for purposes of this section 8 U.S.C., Section


1621(c)(1)(A).


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-324 DC 1/19/2025 5:41:06 AM





Req. No. 324 Page 5